Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-525
Act, how cited.

Sections 88-525 to 88-552 shall be known and may be cited as the Grain Warehouse Act.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1123, § 4;

Laws 2003, LB 735, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 492, § 2.